Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5983.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 16-8-10 and 16-8-10.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-8 entitled
"Federal Aid [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" are hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-8-10. Mandatory school lunch programs.
All public elementary and secondary schools shall be required to make breakfast and
federally reimbursable lunches available to students attending those schools through the USDA’s
National School Lunch Program (NSLP) in accordance with federal regulation as well as rules and
regulations adopted from time to time by the department of elementary and secondary education.
To the extent that federal, state, and other funds are available, free and. Free breakfast and
reimbursable lunches shall be provided to all students from families that meet the current specific
criteria established by federal and state regulations to who qualify for free or reduced-price meals.
The state of Rhode Island shall provide additional funds to public schools in an amount equal to
the difference between the federal reimbursement rate for a free lunch and the federal
reimbursement rate received for each student eligible for a reduced-price lunch and receiving lunch.
The requirement that free breakfast and reimbursable lunches be provided shall apply to locally
managed school lunch programs, and school breakfast and lunch programs administered directly
by the department of elementary and secondary education or by any other public agency whether
using school facilities or a commercial catering service. The department of elementary and
secondary education is further authorized to expand the school breakfast and lunch programs to the

extent that federal, state, and/or local funds are available by the utilization of one or more food
preparation centers for delivery to participating schools for the purpose of providing meals to
students on a more economical basis than could be provided by a community acting individually.
16-8-10.1. Mandatory school breakfast programs.
(a) All public elementary and secondary schools shall be required to make federally
reimbursable school breakfasts available to students attending those schools through the USDA’s
School Breakfast Program (SBP) in accordance with federal regulation as well as rules and
regulations that are adopted from time to time by the department of elementary and secondary
education and in compliance with the provisions of § 16-8-10. To the extent that federal, state, and
other funds are available, free Free reimbursable breakfasts shall be provided to all students from
families that meet the current specific criteria established by federal and state regulations to who
qualify for free or reduced-price meals. The state of Rhode Island shall provide additional funds to
public schools in an amount equal to the difference between the federal reimbursement rate
received for a free breakfast and the federal reimbursement rate received for each student eligible
for a reduced-price breakfast and receiving breakfast.
(b) The state of Rhode Island shall provide school districts a per-breakfast subsidy for each
breakfast served to students. The general assembly shall annually appropriate some sum and
distribute it based on each district’s proportion of the number of breakfasts served in the prior
school year relative to the statewide total in the same year. This subsidy shall augment the nonprofit
school food service account and be used for expenses incurred in providing nutritious breakfast
meals to students.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000952
========
LC000952 - Page 2 of 3